Wyoming, session 2025, SF0180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1013(d) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) is amended to read:

9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.

SF0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0437
(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
supplemental budget, request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:

(vii) Any recommendations in a supplemental
budget from the governor or agencies shall be limited to
the following recommendations for amendments to the state
budget:

(A) Necessary reductions occasioned by the
most recent published consensus revenue estimating group
estimate of revenue shortfalls;

(B) Appropriations necessitated by human or
natural disasters;

(C) Appropriations necessitated by public
welfare emergencies as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(xxv) for
SF0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0437
which amounts appropriated for public welfare emergencies
under W.S. 9-2-1014.3 are insufficient;

(D) Recommendations regarding increases or
decreases to savings;

(E) Necessary personnel adjustments.

Section 2. W.S. 9-2-1013(d)(vi) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0180